Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 2. PARKS AND WILDLIFE DEPARTMENT

CHAPTER 11. PARKS AND WILDLIFE DEPARTMENT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 11.001. DEFINITIONS. In this code:

(1) "Commission" means the Parks and Wildlife Commission.

(2) "Department" means the Parks and Wildlife Department.

(3) "Director" means the executive director of the Parks and Wildlife Department.

(4) "Presiding officer" means the presiding officer of the Parks and Wildlife Commission.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 47, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.002. POLICY IMPLEMENTATION. The commission shall develop and implement policies that clearly separate the policymaking responsibilities of the commission and the management responsibilities of the director and the department staff.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.003. APPLICABILITY OF CERTAIN STATE LAW REQUIREMENTS. A requirement under state law that a law enforcement agency adopt a policy that requires the collection and reporting of information relating to persons detained during traffic stops, that a peace officer report information relating to persons detained during traffic and pedestrian stops, or that a law enforcement agency compile, analyze, and report information relating to persons detained during traffic and pedestrian stops does not apply to the department or an employee of the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.004. RULES RELATING TO RESIDENCY FOR HUNTING AND OTHER PURPOSES. (a) The commission by rule may prescribe the proof required to demonstrate residency in this state for the purpose of obtaining a license or permit issued by the department.

(b) Expired.

(c) Expired.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 961 (H.B. 1636), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 11.005. SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBERS OF CERTAIN MINORS. (a) The commission may not adopt rules that require a person 13 years of age or younger who applies for a license under Chapter 42, 46, or 50 to provide the applicant's social security number.

(b) The commission may adopt a rule requiring an applicant described by Subsection (a) or the applicant's parent or guardian to sign a statement that the applicant is not an obligor subject to a child support order.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 153 (H.B. 821), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. ORGANIZATION OF DEPARTMENT

Sec. 11.011. PARKS AND WILDLIFE DEPARTMENT. The Parks and Wildlife Department is established as an agency of the state. It is under the policy direction of the Parks and Wildlife Commission.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 541, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 11.0111. SUNSET PROVISION. The Parks and Wildlife Department is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the department is abolished September 1, 2035.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 1846, ch. 735, Sec. 2.099a, eff. Aug. 29, 1977. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 479, Sec. 206, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 17, Sec. 5.21(a), eff. Nov. 12, 1991; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 928 (H.B. 3249), Sec. 2.05, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (S.B. 1659), Sec. 3.09, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 11.012. COMMISSION. (a) The commission consists of nine members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of two-thirds of the members of the senate present and voting.

(b) If the senate is not in session, the governor shall appoint the members and issue commissions to them as provided by law, and their appointment shall be submitted to the next session of the senate for its advice and consent in the manner that appointments to fill vacancies under the constitution are submitted to the senate.

(c) Commission members must be members of the general public and meet the qualifications provided by Section 11.0121.

(d) In making appointments under this section, the governor shall attempt to include persons with expertise in diverse fields, including fields such as historic preservation, conservation, and outdoor recreation.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3180, ch. 543, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 11.0121. QUALIFICATIONS. A person may not be a public member of the commission if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is registered, certified, or licensed by a regulatory agency in the field of conservation, outdoor recreation, or commercial fishing, unless the license is a noncommercial hunting or fishing license or a license issued under Subchapter D, Chapter 43;

(2) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the department;

(3) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the department; or

(4) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or money from the department other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for commission membership, attendance, or expenses.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0122. CONFLICT OF INTEREST. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

(b) A person may not be a member of the commission and may not be a department employee employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.) and its subsequent amendments, if:

(1) the person is a paid or compensated officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of conservation, outdoor recreation, or commercial fishing; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of conservation, outdoor recreation, or commercial fishing.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0123. LOBBYIST PROHIBITION. A person may not be a member of the commission or act as the general counsel to the commission or the department if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the department.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 167, Sec. 2.19(23), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0124. DISCRIMINATION IN APPOINTMENTS PROHIBITED. Appointments to the commission shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointees.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0125. REMOVAL OF A COMMISSION MEMBER. (a) It is a ground for removal from the commission that:

(1) a public member does not have at the time of taking office the qualifications required by Section 11.0121;

(2) a public member does not maintain during service on the commission the qualifications required by Section 11.0121;

(3) a member is ineligible for membership under Section 11.012(c), 11.0122, or 11.0123;

(4) a member cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) a member is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled commission meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the commission.

(b) The validity of an action of the commission is not affected by the fact that it is taken when a ground for removal of a commission member exists.

(c) If the director has knowledge that a potential ground for removal exists, the director shall notify the presiding officer of the commission of the potential ground. The presiding officer shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists. If the potential ground for removal involves the presiding officer, the director shall notify the next highest ranking officer of the commission, who shall then notify the governor and the attorney general that a potential ground for removal exists.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0126. TRAINING PROGRAM FOR COMMISSION MEMBERS. (a) A person who is appointed to and qualifies for office as a member of the commission may not vote, deliberate, or be counted as a member in attendance at a meeting of the commission until the person completes a training program that complies with this section.

(b) The training program must provide the person with information regarding:

(1) the law governing department operations;

(2) the programs, functions, rules, and budget of the department;

(3) the scope of and limitations of the rulemaking authority of the commission;

(4) the results of the most recent formal audit of the department;

(5) the requirements of:

(A) laws relating to open meetings, public information, administrative procedure, and disclosing conflicts of interest; and

(B) other laws applicable to members of a state policy-making body in performing their duties; and

(6) any applicable ethics policies adopted by the department or the Texas Ethics Commission.

(c) A person appointed to the commission is entitled to reimbursement, as provided by the General Appropriations Act, for the travel expenses incurred in attending the training program regardless of whether the attendance at the program occurs before or after the person qualifies for office.

(d) The director shall create a training manual that includes the information required by Subsection (b). The director shall distribute a copy of the training manual annually to each member of the commission. Each member of the commission shall sign and submit to the director a statement acknowledging that the member received and has reviewed the training manual.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 11.013. TERMS. The members of the commission hold office for staggered terms of six years, with the terms of three members expiring every two years. Each member holds office until his successor is appointed and has qualified. The terms expire on January 31 of odd-numbered years.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3180, ch. 543, Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 1983.

Sec. 11.014. PRESIDING OFFICER. (a) The governor shall designate a member of the commission as the presiding officer of the commission to serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the governor.

(b) A vacancy in the office of presiding officer is filled in the same manner as the original designation.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3180, ch. 543, Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 1983; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.015. MEETINGS, QUORUM. (a) The commission may meet as often as is necessary but shall meet at least once during each quarter of the year. Five members constitute a quorum.

(b) The commission shall hold an annual public meeting to receive public comments concerning any issue relating to the commission's regulatory powers and duties.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3180, ch. 543, Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 11.0151. PUBLIC HEARINGS. (a) In this section, "major decision" means a decision in which a vote is taken on:

(1) a rule;

(2) a proclamation;

(3) a contract;

(4) a budget;

(5) a grant;

(6) a development plan for a geographical area managed by the department;

(7) a memorandum of understanding with another governmental entity; or

(8) any other issue as determined by the commission.

(b) The commission shall develop and implement policies that will provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the commission and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the commission.

(c) The commission, or any committee of the commission with at least five commission members serving on the committee, shall provide an opportunity for public testimony in an open meeting before making a major decision.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.016. EXPENSES, PER DIEM. Members of the commission are entitled to reimbursement for their actual expenses incurred in attending meetings and to the per diem as provided in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 11.0161. NOTIFICATION OF COMMISSION ACTIVITIES. (a) The commission shall prepare information of public interest describing the functions of the commission. The commission shall make the information available to the general public and appropriate state agencies.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 130, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 11.0162. ADVISORY COMMITTEES TO COMMISSION. (a) The presiding officer may appoint committees to advise the commission on issues under its jurisdiction.

(b) The presiding officer may adopt rules that set the membership, terms of service, qualifications, operating procedures, and other standards to ensure the effectiveness of an advisory committee appointed under this section.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 925, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 48, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0163. USE OF TECHNOLOGY. The commission shall implement a policy requiring the department to use appropriate technological solutions to improve the department's ability to perform its functions. The policy must ensure that the public is able to interact with the department on the Internet.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 11.0164. NEGOTIATED RULEMAKING AND ALTERNATIVE DISPUTE RESOLUTION PROCEDURES. (a) The commission shall develop and implement a policy to encourage the use of:

(1) negotiated rulemaking procedures under Chapter 2008, Government Code, for the adoption of department rules; and

(2) appropriate alternative dispute resolution procedures under Chapter 2009, Government Code, to assist in the resolution of internal and external disputes under the department's jurisdiction.

(b) The department's procedures relating to alternative dispute resolution must conform, to the extent possible, to any model guidelines issued by the State Office of Administrative Hearings for the use of alternative dispute resolution by state agencies.

(c) The commission shall designate a trained person to:

(1) coordinate the implementation of the policy adopted under Subsection (a);

(2) serve as a resource for any training needed to implement the procedures for negotiated rulemaking or alternative dispute resolution; and

(3) collect data concerning the effectiveness of those procedures, as implemented by the department.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 11.0165. COMPLAINTS. (a) The department shall maintain a system to promptly and efficiently act on complaints filed with the department. The department shall maintain information about parties to the complaint, the subject matter of the complaint, a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint, and its disposition.

(b) The department shall make information available describing its procedures for complaint investigation and resolution.

(c) The department shall periodically notify the complaint parties of the status of the complaint until final disposition unless the notice would jeopardize an investigation.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 11.017. EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR. The commission may appoint an executive director who is the chief executive officer of the department and performs its administrative duties. The director serves at the will of the commission.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 11.0171. AUTHORITY TO CONTRACT. (a) Subject to Section 12.0251, for the purpose of carrying out the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the department, the executive director, or the executive director's designee, may negotiate, contract, or enter an agreement:

(1) with:

(A) the United States or any of its agencies;

(B) another state or a political subdivision of another state or of this state; or

(C) a nonprofit organization for research and field work; or

(2) for professional services relating to a project of the department, including project management, design, bid, and construction administration, consistent with Subchapter A, Chapter 2254, Government Code.

(b) The commission by rule shall adopt policies and procedures consistent with applicable state procurement practices for soliciting and awarding the contracts under this section.

(c) The executive director may negotiate with and award a contract for goods or services to any qualified vendor if the executive director:

(1) solicits bids for the goods or services through a competitive process in compliance with all applicable laws, including Chapters 2155, 2254, and 2269, Government Code, that fails to result in competitive responsive bids;

(2) makes a written determination that resoliciting bids for the goods or services would:

(A) be unlikely to result in responsive bids;

(B) increase costs to the department; or

(C) delay the ability of the department to address a critical need; and

(3) determines that the vendor meets the requirements of the original solicitation.

(d) To the extent practicable, the executive director may combine the procurement of multiple goods or services into a single competitively bid contract to enhance the contract's attraction for potential vendors.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 618, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 296 (H.B. 2777), Sec. 1, eff. June 2, 2023.

Sec. 11.0172. LIMIT ON CONTRACTS FOR PUBLICATIONS. (a) In this section:

(1) "Publication" includes the publication of a book, magazine, photograph, poster, or bulletin.

(2) "Youth" means an individual younger than 17 years of age.

(b) The department may not contract with a person regarding a publication unless the contract provides the department the authority to:

(1) terminate the contract for a violation of a rule adopted under Subsection (c);

(2) retain final approval over the content of the publication, including advertising; and

(3) request and receive an appropriate number of copies of the publication that contain advertising that is appropriate for viewing by youth.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules regarding the types of advertising that are appropriate for viewing by youth.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0173. PROHIBITION ON TOBACCO ADVERTISING. (a) In this section, "publication" includes the publication of a book, magazine, photograph, poster, or bulletin.

(b) The department may not accept an advertisement that promotes the sale of tobacco in a publication sponsored or published by the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0174. INTERNAL AFFAIRS OFFICE. (a) The executive director shall establish the office of internal affairs.

(b) The office of internal affairs has original departmental jurisdiction over all investigations of cases alleging criminal conduct:

(1) occurring on department property;

(2) engaged in by on-duty department employees; or

(3) engaged in by officers commissioned by the department performing off-duty work related to their official duties.

(c) The office of internal affairs shall oversee and review, but need not conduct, all investigations under this section.

(d) An investigation under this section may be initiated only by the executive director or the commission.

(e) The executive director shall appoint the head of the office of internal affairs. The head of the office of internal affairs serves until removed by the executive director.

(f) The head of the office of internal affairs shall:

(1) report directly to the executive director regarding performance of and activities related to investigations;

(2) report to the executive director for administrative purposes; and

(3) provide the executive director or commission with information regarding investigations as appropriate.

(g) The head of the office of internal affairs shall present at each regularly scheduled commission meeting and at other appropriate times a summary of information relating to investigations conducted under this section that includes analysis of the number, type, and outcome of investigations, trends in the investigations, and any recommendations to avoid future complaints.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 11.018. EMPLOYEES. The director may appoint heads of divisions, law enforcement officers, park managers, and other employees authorized by appropriations and necessary for administering the duties and services of the department. These employees serve at the will of the director.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 122, ch. 29, Sec. 1, eff. April 19, 1983.

Sec. 11.0181. EMPLOYEES AS EDUCATORS AND OUTREACH PROPONENTS. (a) Employees of the department through education and outreach shall:

(1) expand the wise use and conservation of fish and wildlife resources; and

(2) increase the participation in outdoor recreation, including recreational activities in urban areas consistent with the mission and goals of the department.

(b) The department may use money from any of the department's special accounts to pay for education and outreach activities performed by department employees or to provide grants for education and outreach activities to be performed by other entities.

(c) The department shall manage the outreach and education activities performed under this section to ensure that the activities:

(1) are consistent with the department's mission and goals;

(2) do not duplicate other efforts by the department or other entities;

(3) provide a cost-effective method for reaching participants; and

(4) can be effectively measured.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0182. EMPLOYEE FUND-RAISING. (a) This section applies only to the solicitation or receipt of a gift, including money, that has a value of $500 or more.

(b) The commission by rule shall adopt policies to govern fund-raising activities by department employees on behalf of the department. The rules must:

(1) designate the types of employees who may solicit donations;

(2) restrict where and how fund-raising may occur; and

(3) establish requirements for reports by employees to the director.

(c) The director shall approve and manage fund-raising activities by department employees on behalf of the department in accordance with commission rules.

(d) The state auditor may audit the fund-raising activities performed under this section, subject to a risk assessment performed by the state auditor and to the legislative audit committee's approval of including the audit in the audit plan under Section 321.013(c), Government Code. If the state auditor performs an audit, the audit shall disclose who has engaged in fund-raising activities for the department and the value of gifts each person has received or solicited. The state auditor shall report the results of the audit to the presiding officer of each house of the legislature and of each committee having primary jurisdiction over the department. Each member of the legislature may access the report.

(e) Policies adopted by the commission under Subsection (b) are public information under Chapter 552, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 785, Sec. 74, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 11.0183. DONATION OF ACCRUED COMPENSATORY TIME OR ACCRUED ANNUAL LEAVE FOR LEGISLATIVE PURPOSES. (a) The director shall allow a peace officer commissioned by the department to voluntarily transfer to a legislative leave pool up to eight hours of compensatory time or annual leave per year earned by the peace officer.

(b) The director or the director's designee shall administer the legislative leave pool.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules and prescribe procedures relating to the operation of the legislative leave pool.

(d) The director or the director's designee shall credit the legislative leave pool with the amount of time contributed by a peace officer commissioned by the department and deduct a corresponding amount of time from the peace officer's earned compensatory time or annual leave as if the peace officer had used the time for personal purposes.

(e) A peace officer commissioned by the department is entitled to use time contributed to the legislative leave pool if the peace officer uses the time for legislative leave on behalf of a law enforcement association:

(1) related to the peace officer's employment with the department;

(2) that has at least 150 active or retired members; and

(3) that is governed by a board of directors.

(f) The director or the director's designee shall transfer time from the pool to the peace officer and credit the time to the peace officer.

(g) A peace officer commissioned by the department may only withdraw time from the legislative leave pool in coordination with and with the consent of the president or designee of the law enforcement association described in Subsection (e). A peace officer may not draw more than 80 hours from the pool in a 160-hour work cycle and may not draw more than 480 hours from the pool in a fiscal year.

(h) A peace officer commissioned by the department shall use time from the legislative leave pool in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 278 (S.B. 922), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 11.019. EMPLOYEES AS PEACE OFFICERS. (a) The director may commission as peace officers any of the employees provided for in the general appropriations act.

(b) Law enforcement officers commissioned by the director have the same powers, privileges, and immunities as peace officers coextensive with the boundaries of this state.

(c) Law enforcement officers commissioned by the director have the same authority as a sheriff to arrest, serve criminal or civil process, and require aid in serving criminal or civil process coextensive with the boundaries of this state.

(d) A law enforcement officer commissioned by the director may arrest without a warrant any person in this state found in the act of violating any law.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 122, ch. 29, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1983.

Sec. 11.0191. ENFORCEMENT OF CODE. Law enforcement officers commissioned by the director and any other peace officers have the authority to enforce all provisions of this code.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 123, ch. 29, Sec. 3, eff. April 19, 1983.

Sec. 11.0192. PURCHASE OF BADGE BY RETIRING PEACE OFFICER OR SURVIVOR. (a) A peace officer commissioned by the director who is honorably retired from his commission by the department may purchase for an amount set by the department, not to exceed fair market value, one badge issued to the officer by the department. The purchase must be made before the second anniversary of the date of the officer's retirement.

(b) If a peace officer commissioned by the director dies while commissioned, whether or not the death occurred in the discharge of the officer's official duties as a peace officer, the following persons, in descending order of precedence, may purchase a badge issued to the officer under the same conditions imposed on a purchase by a retiring officer by Subsection (a) of this section:

(1) the surviving spouse of the officer;

(2) any children of the officer; or

(3) the parents of the officer.

Added by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 763, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 31, 1987.

Sec. 11.0193. PURCHASE OF FIREARM FROM DEPARTMENT BY COMMISSIONED PEACE OFFICER. (a) An employee commissioned by the director as a peace officer may purchase for an amount set by the department, not to exceed fair market value, a firearm issued to the person by the department if:

(1) the firearm is not listed as a prohibited weapon under Section 46.05, Penal Code; and

(2) the firearm is retired by the department for replacement purposes.

(b) The commission may adopt rules for the sale of a retired firearm under this section to a peace officer commissioned by the director.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 475 (S.B. 417), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 11.0195. USE OF FUNDS TO SUPPORT PEACE OFFICER TRAINING. The department, subject to director approval, may use appropriated funds to purchase food and beverages for training functions required of peace officers of the department.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1270 (H.B. 78), Sec. 4, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 11.020. DEPUTY GAME WARDENS. (a) The director may commission deputy game wardens to serve at the will of the director. Provided, however, that no deputy game warden commissioned under this section may be commissioned for a period of longer than four years. At the expiration of each four-year commission the deputy game warden shall be eligible for recommission.

(b) The commission shall make regulations to govern the qualifications, conduct, and duties of commissioned deputy game wardens. The director shall implement an education course which includes training in pertinent aspects of a game warden's duties. Completion of this course shall be a prerequisite to any person obtaining a commission as deputy game warden.

(c) A commissioned deputy game warden may enforce state laws relating to hunting and fishing and to the preservation and conservation of wildlife and marine animals. The department shall prescribe the geographical area in which a deputy game warden may operate, except that a deputy game warden may not operate on the coastal waters, bays, or estuaries of this state. At all times when any commissioned deputy game warden is on duty or is acting in an official capacity he shall carry official identification and shall wear an official badge which is clearly visible. A commissioned deputy game warden must present his official identification to any person he believes is violating this code before the deputy game warden makes an investigation or arrest. A commissioned deputy game warden shall purchase and wear at all times when on duty or acting in an official capacity a uniform prescribed by the department.

(d) A deputy game warden must file an oath and a bond in the amount of $2,000 payable to the department at the time he receives the commission.

(e) Commissioned deputy game wardens serve without compensation from the state, but the department may expend necessary funds to support and maintain this responsibility.

Added by Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 650, ch. 241, Sec. 1, eff. May 25, 1977.

Sec. 11.0201. SPECIAL GAME WARDENS. (a) The director may commission as a special game warden an honorably retired commissioned game warden of the department.

(b) An applicant for a special game warden commission must meet the minimum standards for licensing of a peace officer under the rules adopted by the Texas Commission on Law Enforcement.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d) of this section, a special game warden is subject to the orders of the director for special duty to the same extent as other law enforcement officers commissioned under this subchapter.

(d) A special game warden may enforce only:

(1) provisions of this code;

(2) regulations promulgated by the commission;

(3) provisions of the Penal Code; and

(4) other state laws intended to protect life or property, except a law that regulates the use of a motor vehicle on state highways.

(e) The department may assign a special game warden for duty in any area of the state, under the authority of the department's supervisory personnel in that area.

(f) The director has authority over the law enforcement activities of a special game warden regardless of whether the special game warden is on active or inactive status.

(g) The commission by rule shall establish standards governing the conduct and duties of special game wardens.

(h) Before the director may issue a special game warden commission, the applicant must file an oath and a bond in the amount of $2,500. The bond must be executed by a surety company authorized to do business in this state, must indemnify all persons against damages resulting from an unlawful act of the special game warden, and must be payable to the department at the time the applicant receives the commission.

(i) A special game warden commission expires on August 31 of the second calendar year following the year in which the commission is granted. At expiration of the commission, a special game warden is eligible for recommission. A special game warden serves at the will of the director.

(j) The commission by rule shall determine compensation for the services of a special game warden. Compensation for a special game warden may not exceed the actual value of the services rendered by the special game warden.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 212, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 93 (S.B. 686), Sec. 2.59, eff. May 18, 2013.

Sec. 11.021. INFORMATION CONCERNING QUALIFICATIONS AND RESPONSIBILITIES. The director or the director's designee shall provide to commission members and department employees, as often as necessary, information regarding the requirements for office or employment under this chapter, including information regarding a person's responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.022. EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYMENT. (a) The director or the director's designee shall prepare and maintain a written policy statement that implements a program of equal employment opportunity to ensure that all personnel decisions are made without regard to race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

(b) The policy statement must include:

(1) personnel policies, including policies relating to recruitment, evaluation, selection, training, and promotion of personnel, that show the intent of the department to avoid the unlawful employment practices described by Chapter 21, Labor Code; and

(2) an analysis of the extent to which the composition of the department's personnel is in accordance with state and federal law and a description of reasonable methods to achieve compliance with state and federal law.

(c) The policy statement must be:

(1) updated annually;

(2) reviewed by the state Commission on Human Rights for compliance with Subsection (b); and

(3) filed with the governor's office.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.023. CAREER LADDER PROGRAM. The director or his designee shall develop an intraagency career ladder program, one part of which shall require the intraagency posting of all nonentry level positions concurrently with any public posting.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 11.024. PERFORMANCE EVALUATIONS. The director or his designee shall develop a system of annual performance evaluations based on measurable job tasks. All merit pay for department employees must be based on the system established under this section.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 11.025. AUDIT. The financial transactions of the department are subject to audit by the state auditor in accordance with Chapter 321, Government Code.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 584, Sec. 90, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 11.0255. EVALUATION OF CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS. (a) The department shall calculate the costs of each department construction project as the project is completed.

(b) In calculating the costs under Subsection (a), the department shall consider both direct and indirect costs of department employees who perform project tasks.

(c) On request, the comptroller shall provide technical assistance to the department.

(d) Using the costs calculated under this section for completed projects, the department shall evaluate the costs and benefits of contracting with private entities or individuals to manage proposed construction-related tasks or projects.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 706), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 11.026. GIFTS OF PROPERTY OR MONEY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the department may accept gifts of property or money in support of any department purpose authorized in this code.

(b) The department may not accept a gift or other donation from a person who holds a commercial license issued by the department. For the purposes of this section, a license issued under Subchapter D, Chapter 43, is not a commercial license.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0261. PROHIBITION AGAINST ACCEPTANCE OF GIFTS, GRATUITIES, AND OTHER THINGS OF VALUE; EXCEPTION. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a person who is a member of the commission or an employee of the department may not accept a gift, gratuity, or other thing of value, including travel, from a person who:

(1) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization that receives funds from the department;

(2) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization that receives funds from the department;

(3) is a person a significant portion of whose business consists of furnishing goods or services to an entity or organization described by Subdivision (1) or (2); or

(4) is an agent, representative, attorney, employee, officer, owner, director, or partner of an entity, organization, or person described by Subdivision (1), (2), or (3).

(b) A department employee may accept reimbursement for travel expenses from the official nonprofit partner designated by the commission under Section 11.205 if:

(1) the employee has sufficiently documented the expense; and

(2) the expense arose out of the performance of an activity related to an employee's official duties regarding the partner.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.0262. CERTAIN GRATUITIES AUTHORIZED. (a) An employee of the state parks division of the department may accept a gratuity if:

(1) the employee, as a primary job duty, serves food or beverages in a restaurant, cafeteria, or other food service establishment located within a state park and owned and operated by the department;

(2) the employee, as an auxiliary duty in performance of a regular duty renders a special customer service to an individual or group;

(3) the gratuity is offered by a customer:

(A) of the restaurant, cafeteria, food service establishment, or hospitality unit of the state parks division in appreciation of being served food or beverages by the employee; or

(B) of a hospitality unit of the state parks division, in appreciation of receiving some other customer service from the employee;

(4) the department has designated the employee as an employee authorized to accept a gratuity; and

(5) the employee reports the gratuity in accordance with commission rules.

(b) The commission may adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 639 (H.B. 2685), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 15, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 11.027. ESTABLISHMENT OF FEES; REVENUE. (a) In setting the amounts of the fees authorized by this code, the commission shall establish reasonable and necessary fees for the administration of department programs but may not maintain unnecessary fund balances.

(b) The commission by rule may establish and provide for the collection of a fee to cover costs associated with the review of an application for a permit required by this code.

(c) The department may sell any item in the possession of the department in which the state has title, or acquire and resell items if a profit can be made, to provide funding for programs administered by the department.

(d) The commission may set and charge a fee for the use of a credit card to pay a fee assessed by the department in an amount reasonable and necessary to reimburse the department for the costs involved in the use of the card. The department shall deposit the money in the state treasury.

(e) The commission by rule may establish and provide for the collection of a fee for entering, reserving, or using a facility or property owned or managed by the department.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 780, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 447, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 11.0271. PUBLIC HUNTING DRAWING; FEES. (a) The department may conduct public drawings to select applicants for public hunting privileges. The department may charge each person who participates in the drawing a nonrefundable participation fee in addition to any fee for issuing a hunting permit or license. The participation fee shall be set by the commission in an amount sufficient to pay the costs of operating the drawing.

(b) The commission may approve participation fees, not to exceed $25 per species for each participant on an application, in drawings for special hunting programs, packages, or events that exceed the costs of operating the drawing only if the fees charged are designated for use in the management and restoration efforts of the specific wildlife program implementing each special hunting program, package, or event.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 635, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 78, eff. June 16, 1995.

Sec. 11.0272. PUBLIC FISHING AND SPECIAL EVENTS DRAWING; FEES. (a) The department may conduct public drawings to select applicants for public fishing or other special events privileges. The department may charge each person who participates in the drawing a nonrefundable participation fee in addition to any fee for issuing a permit or fishing license. The participation fee shall be set by the commission in an amount sufficient to pay the costs of operating the drawing.

(b) The commission may approve participation fees, not to exceed $25 per species or event for each participant on an application, in drawings for special fishing or other special programs, packages, or events the costs of which exceed the costs of operating the drawing only if the receipts from fees charged are designated for use in the management and restoration efforts of the specific fishery or resource program implementing each special fishing or other special program, package, or event.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 11.028. VOLUNTEER SERVICES. (a) The department may use the services of volunteers to help carry out the duties and responsibilities of the department, provided, however, that volunteers shall not be used to enforce provisions of this code or to carry out department duties and responsibilities on private property unless the landowner has consented to the activity.

(b) The department may accept funds raised by a volunteer or volunteer group to promote the work of the department and to help carry out its duties and responsibilities. The department may use the funds for the specific project or purpose for which the funds are intended.

(c) The director may waive park entrance fees and facility use fees for a volunteer to assist in the accomplishment of the volunteer's service to the department.

(d) The executive director may expend funds appropriated to the department from dedicated funding sources for:

(1) the establishment of an insurance program to protect volunteers in the performance of volunteer service;

(2) recognition of the services of a volunteer or volunteer groups.

(e) The commission shall authorize the administrator of a state park to provide passes to the state park to members of nonprofit youth groups who volunteer to help carry out the duties and responsibilities of the department at the park. For purposes of this subsection, "nonprofit youth group" means a nonprofit organization that:

(1) is chartered as a national or statewide organization;

(2) is organized and operated exclusively for youth recreational or educational purposes and that includes, as part of the group's program, components relating to:

(A) character development;

(B) citizenship training;

(C) physical and mental fitness; and

(D) prevention of drug abuse;

(3) has been in existence for at least 10 years; and

(4) has a membership of which at least 65 percent are younger than 22 years of age.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 910, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 257, Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 1999.

Sec. 11.0281. VOLUNTEER LIABILITY AND IMMUNITY. (a) In this section, "volunteer" means a person rendering services for or on behalf of the department without the expectation of receiving monetary compensation from the department other than reimbursement for expenses incurred by the person during the performance of the service. The term does not include:

(1) a person performing services as a result of a community service or community supervision sentence; or

(2) an inmate providing labor pursuant to Section 497.091, Government Code, or similar law.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), a volunteer while acting within the course and scope of the volunteer's assignment for the department is immune from civil liability for any act or omission of the volunteer resulting from the operation or use of a motor-driven vehicle or motor-driven equipment owned or leased by the department.

(c) This section does not apply to an act or omission that is intentional, wilfully negligent, or done with conscious indifference or reckless disregard for the safety of others.

(d) The department shall, from any funds appropriated to the department, compensate a claimant for property damage, personal injury, or death proximately caused by the wrongful act or omission or the negligence of a volunteer acting within the scope of the volunteer's assignment if:

(1) the property damage, personal injury, or death arises from the operation or use of a motor-driven vehicle or motor-driven equipment owned or leased by the department; and

(2) the volunteer would be personally liable to the claimant under the laws of this state in the absence of the immunity provided by this section.

(e) The amount of compensation paid under Subsection (d) may not exceed the maximum amount applicable to a state agency as specified by Section 101.023(a), Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(f) A volunteer operating or using a motor-driven vehicle or motor-driven equipment owned or leased by the department who is acting within the course and scope of a volunteer assignment for the department is exempt from the requirements of Chapter 601, Transportation Code.

(g) Except as provided by Subsection (d), this section does not create any liability of or waive any immunity of the department, employees of the department, or volunteers for the department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 184 (S.B. 381), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 11.0285. DONATED BUILDING PROJECTS. (a) The department may accept the donation of a turnkey building project on state land provided that the department:

(1) approves the plans and engineering in advance; and

(2) has supervision over the project.

(b) A project under this section is not subject to competitive bidding.

(c) The commission may adopt rules to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1193 (H.B. 3864), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 11.029. ADMINISTRATION OF OATHS. Employees of the department who are designated as provided by the commission may administer oaths in connection with the permitting, licensing, and other functions of the department.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 192, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Renumbered from Sec. 11.028 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 8.01(20), eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 11.030. DISCLOSURE OF PERSONAL CUSTOMER INFORMATION. (a) The name and address and a telephone, social security, driver's license, bank account, credit card, or charge card number of a person who purchases customer products, licenses, or services from the department may not be disclosed, sold, rented, or traded except as authorized under this section or Section 12.014, 12.103, or 12.0251.

(b) Chapter 552, Government Code, does not apply to customer information described by Subsection (a).

(c) The commission by rule shall adopt policies relating to:

(1) the release of the customer information; and

(2) the use of the customer information by the department.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (S.B. 15), Sec. 15(1), eff. June 18, 2021.

(e) The commission or department may disclose customer information to a federal or state law enforcement agency if the agency provides a lawfully issued subpoena.

(e-1) The department may disclose statistical data and compilations of customer information described by Subsection (a) if the information does not reveal information identifying a specific department customer or a department customer's address, telephone number, social security number, or driver's license number.

(e-2) The department may disclose customer information described by Subsection (a) only:

(1) to another governmental body, including a law enforcement entity, as needed to carry out a governmental purpose;

(2) if the customer that is the subject of the information consents in writing to the specific disclosure; or

(3) if the information is:

(A) part of a record that is considered to be a public record under Section 31.039; or

(B) authorized to be disclosed under Section 31.0391.

(e-3) This section does not authorize the department to disclose information the department is prohibited from disclosing by other law.

(f) The department and its officers and employees are immune from civil liability for an unintentional violation of this section.

(g) In this section, a reference to the department includes a reference to an agent of the department.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 519, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (S.B. 15), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (S.B. 15), Sec. 15(1), eff. June 18, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 247 (S.B. 811), Sec. 2, eff. May 27, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. SPECIAL ACCOUNTS

Sec. 11.031. GAME, FISH, AND WATER SAFETY ACCOUNT. There is in the state treasury an account called the "game, fish, and water safety account."

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 546, ch. 260, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.032. GAME, FISH, AND WATER SAFETY ACCOUNT; SOURCES. (a) The game, fish, and water safety account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The department shall deposit to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account all revenue, less allowable costs, from the following sources:

(1) all types of fishing licenses and stamps and shrimping licenses;

(2) all types of hunting licenses and stamps;

(3) trapping licenses and other licenses relating to the taking, propagation, and sale of fur-bearing animals or their pelts;

(4) sale of marl, sand, gravel, shell, and mudshell;

(5) oyster bed rentals and permits;

(6) federal funds received for fish and wildlife research, management, development and conservation, resource protection, and law enforcement, unless the funds are received for the specific purposes of Subchapter F, Chapter 77;

(7) sale of property, less advertising costs, purchased from this account or a special fund or account that is now part of this account;

(8) fines and penalties collected for violations of a law pertaining to the protection and conservation of wild birds, wild fowl, wild animals, fish, shrimp, oysters, game birds and animals, fur-bearing animals, alligators, and any other wildlife resources of this state;

(9) sale of rough fish by the department;

(10) fees for importation permits;

(11) fees from supplying fish for or placing fish in water located on private property;

(12) sale of seized pelts;

(13) sale or lease of grazing rights to and the products from game preserves, sanctuaries, and management areas;

(14) contracts for the removal of fur-bearing animals and reptiles from wildlife management areas;

(15) vessel registration fees;

(16) vessel manufacturer or dealer licensing fees;

(17) fines or penalties imposed by a court for violation of water safety laws contained in Chapter 31 of this code;

(18) alligator hunter's or alligator buyer's licenses;

(19) sale of alligators or any part of an alligator by the department;

(20) fees and revenue collected under Section 11.027(b) or (c) of this code that are associated with the conservation of fish and wildlife;

(21) fees related to cultivated oyster mariculture;

(22) vessel and outboard motor titling fees;

(23) participation fees collected under Section 43.976;

Text of subdivision as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 235 (H.B. 2755), Sec. 1

(24) money received by the department from:

(A) boater education program courses and examinations administered under Section 31.108; and

(B) boater education deferrals issued under the program established under Section 31.110(c); and

Text of subdivision as added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 4018), Sec. 1

(24) money received by the department from carbon sequestration or similar ecosystem services projects described by Section 11.302(b)(1); and

(25) any other source provided by law.

(c) Not later than the 10th day of each month the department may transfer an amount not to exceed 15 percent of all amounts collected during the previous month from sources described by Subsection (b)(15), (16), or (22) to the state parks account.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 546, ch. 260, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 439, ch. 184, Sec. 3, eff. Aug. 31, 1981; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 640, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 1986; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 637, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 780, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 339, Sec. 2, eff. June 8, 1995; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 200, Sec. 7(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 667, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 237 (H.B. 448), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1034 (H.B. 1724), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 174 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 426 (S.B. 733), Sec. 1, eff. June 4, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 915 (H.B. 3607), Sec. 15.001, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 235 (H.B. 2755), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 4018), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 11.033. USE OF GAME, FISH, AND WATER SAFETY ACCOUNT. (a) To the extent allowed by federal law, money in the game, fish, and water safety account may be used for the following purposes:

(1) enforcement of fish, shrimp, and oyster laws, game laws, and laws pertaining to sand, shell, and gravel;

(2) dissemination of information pertaining to marine life, wild animal life, wildlife values, and wildlife management;

(3) scientific investigation and survey of marine life for the better protection and conservation of marine life;

(4) establishment and maintenance of fish hatcheries, fish sanctuaries, tidal water fish passes, wildlife management areas, and public hunting grounds;

(5) propagation and distribution of marine life, game animals, and wild birds;

(6) protection of wild birds, fish, and game;

(7) purchase, repair, and operation of boats and dredges;

(8) research, management, and protection of the fish and wildlife resources of this state, including alligators and fur-bearing animals;

(9) salaries of employees and other expenses necessary to carry out the duties of the department under laws relating to fish, shrimp, oysters, game, water safety, and sand, shell, and gravel;

(10) expansion and development of additional opportunities of hunting and fishing in state-owned land and water;

(11) removing rough fish from public water;

(12) administration and enforcement of the water safety laws as set out in Chapter 31, including administration of the boater education program established under Section 31.108;

(13) purchasing all necessary forms and supplies, including reimbursement of the department for any material produced by its existing facilities or work performed by other divisions of the department;

(14) purchase, construction, and maintenance of boat ramps on or near public waters as provided in Chapter 31;

(15) resource protection activities;

(16) the cleanup of illegal or abandoned cultivated oyster mariculture equipment and related debris in public water; and

(17) any other use provided by law.

(b) The department may use money from license fees paid by hunters and fishermen only for those functions required to manage the fish and wildlife resources of this state.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 547, ch. 260, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1157, ch. 261, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 29, 1983; Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 19, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 23, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 174 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 235 (H.B. 2755), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 11.034. GAME, FISH, AND WATER SAFETY ACCOUNT EXPENDITURES. All expenditures of the department from the game, fish, and water safety account must be approved by the director. The comptroller shall draw a warrant on the state treasury from the game, fish, and water safety account for the amount of the expenditure in favor of the person claiming the expenditure.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 546, ch. 260, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.035. STATE PARKS ACCOUNT. (a) The state parks account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The department shall deposit to the credit of the state parks account all revenue, less allowable costs, received from the following sources:

(1) grants or operation of concessions in state parks or fishing piers;

(2) publications on state parks, state historic sites, or state scientific areas;

(3) fines or penalties received from violations of regulations governing parks issued pursuant to Subchapter B, Chapter 13;

(4) fees and revenue collected under Section 11.027(b) or (c) that are associated with state park lands;

(5) credits made to the department under Section 151.801, Tax Code, in an amount not to exceed the amount of the tax proceeds allocated by the legislature to the account under Section 151.801(c-1), Tax Code, to be used only for the purposes provided by that section;

(6) money received by the department from carbon sequestration or similar ecosystem services projects described by Section 11.302(b)(2); and

(7) any other source provided by law.

(c) The department may deposit to the credit of the state parks account all revenue, less allowable costs, from the following sources:

(1) private contributions, grants, and donations received for state parks-related purposes; and

(2) federal funds received for state parks-related purposes.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 780, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 16, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 1366), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 503 (S.B. 26), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 4018), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 11.037. STATE LAND AND WATER CONSERVATION ACCOUNT. (a) The state land and water conservation account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The department may deposit in the state land and water conservation account any revenue received from the federal government or any other source for the purpose of administering programs authorized under Sections 13.301 through 13.311 of this code.

(c) The state land and water conservation account may be used for paying the cost of planning, acquisition, operation, and development of outdoor recreation and conservation resources of the state and the administrative expenses incident to the projects or programs authorized under Sections 13.301 through 13.311 of this code.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 952 (H.B. 3391), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 11.038. OPERATING ACCOUNT. (a) The parks and wildlife operating account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The commission may transfer any funds appropriated to the department for personal services, travel, consumable supplies and materials, current operating expenses, and capital outlay, as these terms are used in the comptroller's object classification codes of the general appropriations act. All expenditures by the department from this account shall be made only for the purposes for which appropriations are made in the general appropriations act.

(c) The parks and wildlife operating account shall be used for the purposes specified by law and nothing may be done by any officer or employee of the department or commission to divert or jeopardize the account or any portion of the account, including any federal aid the department receives or administers.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.040. MISTAKEN DEPOSIT. (a) Any funds deposited in the state treasury by the department by mistake of fact or mistake of law shall be refunded by warrant issued against the fund and credited against the account in the state treasury into which the money was deposited. Refunds necessary to make the proper correction shall be appropriated by the general appropriations act.

(b) The comptroller may require written evidence from the director of the department to indicate the reason for the mistake of fact or law before issuing the refund warrant authorized in Subsection (a) of this section.

(c) This section does not apply to any funds that have been deposited under a written contract or to any funds on deposit as of June 8, 1971, which are the subject of litigation in any of the courts of this state or the United States.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.041. TRANSFER OF PROPERTY. (a) The commission may transfer tangible property, other than money or real estate held for limited purposes, from one division of the department to another division.

(b) If the property to be transferred was acquired with funds the use of which is limited by law or dedicated in any other manner, and the prospective use of the property is different from the use allowed by law, the department shall transfer from available funds to the fund or account from which the property was acquired the value of the property at the time of the transfer.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.042. FUNDS DEPOSITED IN TREASURY. All money paid to the department under this code or allocated to the department under Section 151.801, Tax Code, other than money received under Subchapter C, Chapter 12, or Chapter 21 of this code, shall be deposited in the State Treasury and may be used only for the administration of this code.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.043. TEXAS PARKS AND WILDLIFE CONSERVATION AND CAPITAL ACCOUNT. (a) The Texas parks and wildlife conservation and capital account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The account consists of:

(1) credits made to the department under Section 151.801, Tax Code, in an amount not to exceed the amount of the tax proceeds allocated by the legislature to the account under Section 151.801(c-1), Tax Code;

(2) proceeds of revenue bonds issued under Section 13.0045; and

(3) money from any other source authorized by law.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), money in the account may be spent only for acquisition and development, maintenance, or operation of parks, fisheries, and wildlife projects that have been individually approved by the commission. Projects that directly provide hunting, fishing, or outdoor recreation opportunity to the public shall be given preference for funding under this section. Approved projects may include:

(1) acquiring land or facilities for use in any department program;

(2) developing and improving any land or facility owned or controlled by the department;

(3) servicing the debt on Texas park development bonds issued under Article III, Section 49-e, of the Texas Constitution or any other bonds issued for parks, fisheries, or wildlife projects;

(4) local park grants in Chapter 24 of this code;

(5) initiating or participating in partnerships to enhance conservation of historical, cultural, or natural resources;

(6) operational and maintenance costs in association with any parks, fisheries, wildlife projects, or department law enforcement efforts in support of this code; and

(7) meeting the requirements for providing matching money for any federal grants for parks, fisheries, or wildlife projects.

(d) The proceeds of bonds issued under Section 13.0045 and deposited to the account may be spent to finance parks and wildlife projects, including the repair, renovation, improvement, and equipping of parks and wildlife facilities. Money deposited to the credit of the account under Subsection (b)(1) may be used only for the purposes described by Section 151.801(c-1), Tax Code.

(e) The comptroller may invest money in the account.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 902, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 17.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1502, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 17, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 82 (S.B. 1366), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 503 (S.B. 26), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 11.044. DISPOSITION OF INTEREST ON INVESTMENTS. (a) Interest received from the investment of money in all accounts of the department in charge of the comptroller shall be allocated monthly to each account in an amount proportionate to the amount of money invested from the account.

(b) The comptroller may retain from the interest to be allocated monthly an amount equal to the necessary administrative costs of making the allocations.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 17.02, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 11.045. APPLICATION OF OTHER LAW. Section 403.095, Government Code, does not apply to revenues accruing to an account established under this chapter.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.046. OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE TRAIL AND RECREATIONAL AREA ACCOUNT. (a) The off-highway vehicle trail and recreational area account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

(b) The department shall deposit to the credit of the off-highway vehicle trail and recreational area account all revenue, less allowable costs, from the following sources:

(1) decal fees collected under Chapter 29;

(2) fines assessed against persons operating off-highway vehicles in violation of Chapter 29 or any other law relating to the operation of off-highway vehicles;

(3) all funding outside the general revenue fund received by the department under Section 29.007; and

(4) all interest that accrues to the account.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 367 (S.B. 1311), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 11.047. USE OF OFF-HIGHWAY VEHICLE TRAIL AND RECREATIONAL AREA ACCOUNT. Money in the off-highway vehicle trail and recreational area account may be used only for expenditures necessary under Chapter 29 to:

(1) acquire, construct, develop, and maintain trails and other recreational areas for use by owners and riders of off-highway vehicles as defined by Section 29.001;

(2) provide access to those trails and recreational areas;

(3) make grants under Section 29.008; and

(4) enforce and administer the off-highway vehicle trail and recreational area program.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 367 (S.B. 1311), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

SUBCHAPTER D. SPECIAL NONGAME AND ENDANGERED SPECIES CONSERVATION ACCOUNT

Sec. 11.051. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Nongame" means those species of vertebrate and invertebrate wildlife that are not classified as game animals, game birds, game fish, fur-bearing animals, endangered species, alligators, marine penaeid shrimp, or oysters.

(2) "Endangered species" means those species listed as provided by Section 68.002 of this code.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1751, ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1983.

Sec. 11.052. SPECIAL NONGAME AND ENDANGERED SPECIES CONSERVATION ACCOUNT. The special nongame and endangered species conservation account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1751, ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1983. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.053. SOURCES OF ACCOUNT. (a) The department shall deposit to the credit of the special nongame and endangered species conservation account all money received from:

(1) private contributions, grants, and donations made to the special nongame and endangered species conservation account;

(2) the net proceeds from the sale under this chapter of wildlife art prints, decals, and stamps;

(3) interest income from the investment of money collected under this section; and

(4) income from entrance fees, easements, mineral leases, grazing leases, and sale of products from lands purchased with funds from the special nongame and endangered species conservation account.

(b) The department may accept private contributions, grants, and donations made to the special nongame and endangered species conservation account.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1751, ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1983. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.054. USES OF ACCOUNT. (a) Money in the special nongame and endangered species conservation account may be used for the following purposes:

(1) dissemination of information pertaining to nongame and endangered species conservation, management, and values;

(2) scientific investigation and survey of nongame and endangered species for better protection and conservation;

(3) propagation, distribution, protection, and restoration of nongame and endangered species;

(4) research and management of nongame and endangered species;

(5) development of habitats for nongame and endangered species;

(6) acquisition of habitats for nongame and endangered species; and

(7) matching of funds available to the department under federal programs for projects and activities authorized under this section.

(b) Appropriations from the special nongame and endangered species conservation account are supplemental, and other accounts may be appropriated for the purposes for which the fund was established.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1751, ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1983. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.055. WILDLIFE ART PRINTS, DECALS, AND STAMPS. (a) The commission may contract with and pay a person for designing and producing the wildlife art prints, decals, and stamps authorized by this subchapter.

(b) The commission may authorize an agent, including a nonprofit wildlife conservation organization, to sell the wildlife art prints, decals, and stamps, and shall provide for the widespread availability of those items to the public.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1751, ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1983.

Sec. 11.056. COSTS OF WILDLIFE ART PRINTS, DECALS, AND STAMPS. (a) The price of a wildlife art decal or stamp sold under this subchapter is $5.00 or an amount set by the commission, whichever amount is more. The department may issue other editions of the stamp and decal at amounts set by the commission.

(b) The department shall establish the royalty and a reasonable price to be paid for a wildlife art print sold under this subchapter.

(c) Repealed by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 80, eff. June 16, 1995.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1751, ch. 340, Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 1983. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 931, Sec. 1, 80, eff. June 16, 1995.

SUBCHAPTER E. LIFETIME LICENSE ENDOWMENT ACCOUNT

Sec. 11.061. LIFETIME LICENSE ENDOWMENT ACCOUNT. The lifetime license endowment account is a separate account in the general revenue fund.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.062. SOURCES OF ACCOUNT. (a) The department shall deposit to the credit of the lifetime license endowment account all money received from:

(1) lifetime hunting, fishing, or combination licenses;

(2) private contributions, grants, and donations made for purposes of this subchapter;

(3) interest income from the investment of money collected under this section; and

(4) any other source provided by law.

(b) The department may accept private contributions, grants, and donations made to the lifetime license endowment account.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.063. USES OF ACCOUNT. To the extent allowed by federal law, money in the lifetime license endowment fund and interest earned on the lifetime license endowment account may be used only for the purpose of managing the fish and wildlife resources of this state, as follows:

(1) acquiring public hunting and fishing areas;

(2) developing, managing, and repairing public hunting and fishing areas; and

(3) making capital expenditures related to fisheries and wildlife resources, including:

(A) land acquisition;

(B) construction; and

(C) the purchase of:

(i) transportation items;

(ii) equipment; and

(iii) information technology resources.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 708 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 11.064. RESTRICTIONS. (a) No expenditure shall be made from the principal of the lifetime license endowment account if that expenditure would lower the unencumbered balance of the principal of the account below $20 million.

(b) The interest earnings on and principal in the lifetime license endowment account may not be used to pay salaries or employee benefits.

(c) The interest earnings on the lifetime license endowment account may be used for any purpose described by Section 11.063.

(d) The principal in the lifetime license endowment account may be used only for the purpose described by Section 11.063(3).

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 708 (H.B. 3781), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 11.065. INVESTMENTS. The commission shall adopt rules for the investment of the lifetime license endowment account.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 21, eff. Sept. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

SUBCHAPTER F. REGULATION OF MINERAL RECOVERY OPERATIONS ON DEPARTMENT LANDS

Sec. 11.071. REGULATION OF MINERAL RECOVERY OPERATIONS. The commission may regulate the use of department lands for oil, gas, and other mineral recovery and associated activities as the commission considers reasonable and necessary to protect the surface estate of department lands or to protect human health or property. Department lands include state parks, wildlife management areas, and natural areas.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 11.072. ENFORCEMENT. (a) If a person has violated, is violating, or is threatening to violate a regulation adopted under this subchapter, the director may have a civil suit brought in a district court for injunctive relief, for assessment and recovery of a civil penalty of not less than $100 for each act of violation, or for both injunctive relief and a civil penalty.

(b) A suit under this subchapter shall be brought in the name of the department through the attorney general.

(c) Reasonable attorney's fees shall also be recoverable, with reimbursement to the operating fund or account from which the expenditure occurred.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.073. DISPOSITION OF CIVIL PENALTIES. All civil penalties recovered in suits under this subchapter shall be paid to the appropriate fund or account of the department.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 679, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 11.074. EFFECT ON OTHER LAWS. This subchapter does not affect the regulatory authority of the Railroad Commission of Texas.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

SUBCHAPTER G. AQUATIC VEGETATION MANAGEMENT

Sec. 11.081. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Governing entity" means the state agency or other political subdivision with jurisdiction over a public body of surface water.

(2) "Integrated pest management" means the coordinated use of pest and environmental information and pest control methods to prevent unacceptable levels of pest damage by the most economical means and in a manner that will cause the least possible hazard to persons, property, and the environment.

(3) "Local plan" means a local aquatic vegetation management plan authorized by Section 11.083.

(4) "Public body of surface water" means any body of surface water that is not used exclusively for an agricultural purpose. The term does not include impounded water on private property.

(5) "State plan" means the state aquatic vegetation management plan authorized by Section 11.082 and developed and implemented under this subchapter.

(6) "Water district" means a conservation and reclamation district or an authority created under authority of Section 52(b)(1) or (2), Article III, or Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution, that has jurisdiction over a public body of surface water. The term does not include a navigation district or a port authority.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1461, Sec. 1.

Sec. 11.082. STATE AQUATIC VEGETATION MANAGEMENT PLAN. (a) The department shall develop and by rule adopt a state aquatic vegetation management plan following the generally accepted principles of integrated pest management. The state plan shall apply throughout the state unless a governmental entity has adopted an approved local plan.

(b) The department shall develop the state plan in coordination with the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission, the Department of Agriculture, water districts and other political subdivisions of the state with jurisdiction over public bodies of surface water, and public drinking water providers.

(c) The state plan must:

(1) establish minimum standards for a governing entity that regulates a public body of surface water;

(2) require that any application of aquatic herbicide complies with label rates approved by the United States Environmental Protection Agency;

(3) ensure that any public drinking water provider that has an intake within two river miles of a site at which an application of aquatic herbicide is proposed to occur receives notice of the proposed application not later than the 14th day before the date the application is to occur;

(4) provide for the coordination, oversight, public notification, and enforcement of all aquatic herbicide use to protect state fish and wildlife resources and habitat and to prevent unreasonable risk from the use of any aquatic herbicide; and

(5) require that the written notice of a proposed application of herbicide include information demonstrating that the proposed application of herbicide under a plan will not result in exceeding:

(A) the maximum contaminant level of the herbicide in finished drinking water as set by the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission and the United States Environmental Protection Agency; or

(B) the maximum label rate, if the aquatic herbicide does not have a maximum contaminant level established by the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission and the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

(d) In administering the state plan, the department shall consult with, advise, provide resources to, and otherwise assist local governments regarding aquatic vegetation management and control. In this subsection, "local government" includes any political subdivision with jurisdiction over a public body of surface water.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1461, Sec. 1. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 24, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.083. LOCAL AQUATIC VEGETATION MANAGEMENT PLAN. (a) A governing entity may develop and adopt a local aquatic vegetation management plan. A local plan must be approved by the department, the Texas Natural Resource Conservation Commission, and the Department of Agriculture.

(b) A local plan may take into account the particular needs and uses of the public bodies of surface water to which it will apply, but the plan may not be approved unless the plan meets the minimum standards set by the state plan. The local plan may allow herbicide use if the person proposing to apply the herbicide notifies the governing entity not later than the 14th day before the proposed date of application.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1461, Sec. 1, eff. Feb. 2, 2001.

Sec. 11.084. APPLICATION OF AQUATIC HERBICIDE IN PUBLIC BODY OF SURFACE WATER. (a) No person may apply aquatic herbicide in a public body of surface water unless the herbicide is applied in a manner consistent with the plan adopted by the governing entity.

(b) State money may not be used to pay for treatment of a public body of surface water with a chemical herbicide unless the application of the herbicide is performed by an applicator licensed for aquatic herbicide application by the Department of Agriculture.

(c) An individual who does not hold an applicator's license and who desires to apply an aquatic herbicide on a public body of surface water shall give written notice not later than the 14th day before the date the application of the aquatic herbicide is to occur to the governing entity with jurisdiction over the body of water on which the application of the herbicide is proposed. The governing entity shall respond to the individual's application not later than the day before the date the application of the aquatic herbicide is to occur. The individual may not apply the aquatic herbicide unless the governing entity finds that the application will be consistent with the state or local plan adopted by the entity.

(d) The state plan may provide for use of an aquatic herbicide consistent with the plan if:

(1) the individual who desires to apply the aquatic herbicide gives notice to the appropriate governing entity in the same manner as provided by Subsection (c) for an unlicensed applicator; and

(2) the governing entity does not disapprove the application.

(e) After receiving notice of a proposed application of aquatic herbicide, the governing entity shall:

(1) provide the individual proposing the application with a copy of the state or local plan, as appropriate;

(2) notify the individual in writing that it is a violation of state law to apply aquatic herbicides in that body of water in a manner inconsistent with the plan; and

(3) determine whether the proposed application is consistent with the plan.

(f) The governing entity shall:

(1) prohibit a proposed application of aquatic herbicide if the governing entity finds that the proposed application is inconsistent with the appropriate plan; or

(2) notify the individual proposing the application of the herbicide that the proposed application is not inconsistent with the appropriate plan if the governing entity finds that the proposed application is not inconsistent with the plan.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1461, Sec. 1, eff. Feb. 2, 2001.

Sec. 11.085. LIABILITY. (a) The liability under other law of a governing entity that receives notice of a proposed application of aquatic herbicide is not affected by the requirements of this subchapter.

(b) Notice by a governing entity to an individual under Section 11.084(f)(2) does not constitute authorization by that entity for the application of the herbicide.

(c) This subchapter does not relieve an individual who applies aquatic herbicide to a public body of surface water of the obligation to comply with all applicable federal, state, or local laws, rules, ordinances, or orders relating to the application of the herbicide in the body of water.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1461, Sec. 1, eff. Feb. 2, 2001.

Sec. 11.086. RECORDS. A governing entity shall maintain for not less than five years all records relating to notifications received under Section 11.084 and any other information relevant to a particular individual request for shoreline treatment.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1461, Sec. 1, eff. Feb. 2, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER H. LAND AND WATER RESOURCES CONSERVATION PLAN

Sec. 11.101. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "conservation" includes the conservation of historical, natural, recreational, and wildlife resources.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.102. PLAN APPROVAL; HEARING REQUIRED. (a) The department must obtain approval from the commission for each development plan required by statute for a geographical area managed by the department.

(b) The commission shall hold a hearing on approval of the plan.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.103. INVENTORY. (a) The department shall inventory all land and water associated with historical, natural, recreational, and wildlife resources in this state that are owned by:

(1) governmental entities; or

(2) nonprofit entities that offer access to the land or water to the public.

(b) The department shall use existing inventory information concerning the lands identified in Subsection (a)(1) whenever possible.

(c) The department shall create a permanent database of the resources inventoried under Subsection (a). At least once every 10 years, the department shall update the database as necessary to reflect changes in the resources.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.104. LAND AND WATER RESOURCES CONSERVATION AND RECREATION PLAN. (a) Using the inventory prepared under Section 11.103, the department shall:

(1) analyze the state's existing and future land and water conservation and recreation needs;

(2) identify threatened land and water resources in this state; and

(3) establish the relative importance for conservation purposes of particular resources listed in the inventory.

(b) The inclusion of a specific parcel of land in the inventory does not create any additional right of public access to that land.

(c) Based on the analysis made under Subsection (a), the department shall prepare a land and water resources conservation and recreation plan. The department shall revise the plan as necessary to reflect changes in the inventory developed under Section 11.103. The plan must include:

(1) criteria for determining how to meet the state's conservation and recreation needs; and

(2) measures of the effectiveness of the department in meeting the goals and objectives of the plan, including, where possible, quantifiable measures.

(d) The department shall modify any existing plans regarding parks and wildlife management areas to make the existing plans consistent with the land and water resources conservation and recreation plan developed under this section.

(e) The department shall base its decisions regarding the state's conservation needs on the criteria developed in the plan, including decisions relating to:

(1) the acquisition of new resources for the conservation and recreation purposes of the department;

(2) the divestiture of existing department-owned resources;

(3) department grants to local parks;

(4) department cooperation with private conservation organizations and landowners, including associations of landowners; and

(5) other major land conservation operations of the department.

(f) Every five years the department shall evaluate progress towards achieving the goals and objectives of the plan prepared under Subsection (c). The department's evaluation must:

(1) include the effectiveness measures under Subsection (c)(2); and

(2) identify:

(A) the goals and objectives met by the department; and

(B) reasons for any unmet goals or objectives.

(g) On completion of an evaluation under Subsection (f), the department shall develop and implement practices designed to improve progress towards meeting the goals and objectives of the plan.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 182 (S.B. 700), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 11.105. COORDINATION OF CONSERVATION AND RECREATION OPERATIONS. The department shall:

(1) consider all resources listed in the inventory prepared under Section 11.103 in conjunction with each other;

(2) coordinate department activities related to those resources internally and with similar activities of other governmental or nonprofit entities; and

(3) set priorities for department activities related to those resources according to the most vital existing and future needs for conservation and recreation.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.106. EXEMPTIONS. Section 11.104 does not apply to:

(1) property that is part of a fund created or specifically authorized by the constitution of this state that is administered by or with the assistance of the School Land Board or the General Land Office; or

(2) land, water, or property owned by the permanent university fund or any other land, water, or property owned by, administered by, or held for the use and benefit of an institution of higher education, as that term is defined in Section 61.003, Education Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 25, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER I. STATEWIDE COMMERCIAL PROJECTS

Sec. 11.151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "statewide commercial project" means a commercial venture undertaken by the department throughout the state, including promotions, sales, or other activities to raise money for the department. The term does not include a promotion or sale undertaken solely at one site.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.152. BUSINESS PLANS. Each business plan developed under this subchapter must include:

(1) a description of the product or service provided;

(2) an analysis of the information necessary for persons to make decisions on the project;

(3) an analysis of the personnel necessary to manage and implement the project;

(4) financial data, including both past performance and a budget and goals for future performance; and

(5) a list of the resources necessary for a successful project.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.153. DEPARTMENT PLAN: OPERATIONAL STRATEGIES. (a) The department shall develop an agency-wide business plan to guide its overall operational strategies for statewide commercial projects. The plan must:

(1) use the plans prepared under Section 11.154 for each project;

(2) evaluate the efficiency of existing projects;

(3) consider or propose changes to any project necessary to meet the department's overall goals;

(4) compare each project's services and products to similar services and products available from the private sector;

(5) seek to increase savings and improve customer service on each project;

(6) coordinate existing projects to avoid duplication and focus resources on the most efficient and effective projects; and

(7) assess the potential for contracting with a private entity or individual to perform department functions relating to specific projects.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 706), Sec. 7(7), eff. September 1, 2017.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 24 (S.B. 706), Sec. 7(7), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 11.154. INDIVIDUAL PROJECT PLANS. (a) The department shall develop a business plan for each statewide commercial project. The plan must contain:

(1) an accurate accounting for all project costs, including personnel and overhead costs; and

(2) reasonable projections of project income.

(b) The director shall review the plan for each project at least annually to assess the overall performance and value of the project.

(c) The department may modify a plan as necessary to meet changing conditions.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.155. ADJUSTMENT OR TERMINATION OF PROJECT FOR FAILURE TO MEET FINANCIAL OBJECTIVES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), the department shall adjust or terminate a statewide commercial project that fails to meet the financial objectives stated in the project's plan.

(b) This section does not apply if the department determines that the project possesses a positive public relations value or fulfills a useful educational purpose.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.156. CONTRACT WITH PRIVATE SECTOR. The department shall consider contracting out all or part of a statewide commercial project to a private entity or individual, including a nonprofit entity or individual.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 26, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

SUBCHAPTER J. NONPROFIT PARTNERSHIPS

Sec. 11.201. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Nonprofit partner" means a nonpolitical legal entity that:

(A) is incorporated under the laws of this state;

(B) has been granted an exemption from federal income tax under Section 501(c), Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(C) works with the department to further department goals; and

(D) is selected as provided under Section 11.202.

(2) "Official nonprofit partner" means the nonprofit partner designated by the commission under Section 11.205.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.202. GENERAL DUTIES. (a) The department may select and cooperate with nonprofit partners to serve department goals.

(b) The department must obtain commission approval for each nonprofit partner selected under Subsection (a).

(c) The commission by rule shall establish best practices for nonprofit partners to comply with.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.203. ACCOUNTABILITY OF NONPROFIT PARTNERS; INVESTMENT RESTRICTIONS. (a) The commission by rule shall require a nonprofit partner to comply with specified state standards and safeguards for accounting for state assets held by the nonprofit partner.

(b) Chapter 2256, Government Code, applies to a nonprofit partner to the extent that the partner controls state money.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.204. PLAN. The department shall provide to each nonprofit partner a copy of the plan developed under Section 11.104.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.205. OFFICIAL NONPROFIT PARTNER. (a) The commission shall designate a single nonprofit partner as the official nonprofit partner of the department, unless the commission determines in writing that no nonprofit partner is capable of effectively implementing the goals of this section.

(b) The official nonprofit partner must be dedicated to meeting department goals.

(c) The official nonprofit partner may accept gifts, grants, and donations to further department goals, including a gift, grant, or donation made in the name of the department.

(d) The official nonprofit partner may use state money to acquire property or engage in construction activities only if that acquisition or construction is consistent with the department's conservation and recreation priorities outlined in the plan developed under Section 11.104.

(e) The official nonprofit partner may organize and manage accounts for local nonprofit partners or other organizations to benefit a specific state park or other sites under the department's jurisdiction.

(f) The commission by rule shall establish:

(1) guidelines under which the official nonprofit partner may solicit and accept sponsorships from private entities; and

(2) best practices under which the partner may engage in activities under this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.206. AUDIT OF OFFICIAL NONPROFIT PARTNER. (a) The official nonprofit partner shall be audited annually by an independent auditor. The partner shall file the audit with the commission.

(b) The official nonprofit partner's financial transactions involving and financial records relating to state money held by the nonprofit partner are subject to audit by the state auditor as provided in Section 321.013, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.207. EXPENDITURES; LIMITS. (a) The department shall direct, by the terms of the contract or grant, how a nonprofit partner may spend any state money it receives.

(b) A state employee may not directly spend or obligate a nonprofit partner's money.

(c) A nonprofit partner may not spend state money to:

(1) lobby or otherwise attempt to influence a member of the legislature; or

(2) directly or indirectly attempt to influence legislation.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 968, Sec. 27, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 11.208. PARTNERSHIP WITH NONPROFIT SERVING VETERANS. (a) In this section, "veteran" means a person who has served in the United States armed forces.

(b) The department may select and cooperate with one or more nonprofit partners that exclusively serve veterans to promote hunting and fishing by those veterans. A selection under this section must be approved by the commission.

(c) A veteran who is a resident of this state and who is served by a nonprofit selected under Subsection (b) may:

(1) hunt on one day without holding a hunting license required under Chapter 42 if accompanied by a representative of the nonprofit partner who holds the appropriate license; and

(2) fish on one day without holding a fishing license required under Chapter 46 if accompanied by a representative of the nonprofit partner who holds the appropriate license.

(d) The commission by rule shall establish:

(1) criteria under which the department may select a nonprofit partner under this section; and

(2) guidelines under which a representative of or a veteran served by a nonprofit partner may engage in hunting or fishing activities under this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 260 (H.B. 1728), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER J-1. FOR-PROFIT PARTNERSHIPS

Sec. 11.221. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Official corporate partner" means a for-profit entity that:

(A) is designated an official corporate partner by the department;

(B) works with the department to raise funds for state site operations and maintenance or other priority projects or programs; and

(C) is selected as provided under Section 11.222.

(2) "State site" means a state park, natural area, wildlife management area, fish hatchery, or historic site under the jurisdiction of the department.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 11.222. SELECTION; CONTRACT. (a) Subject to commission approval, the department may select a for-profit entity as an official corporate partner.

(b) The department may contract with one or more official corporate partners to raise funds for state site operations and maintenance or other priority projects or programs.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 11.223. GIFTS AND GRANTS; FUND-RAISING. (a) To raise funds for state site operations and maintenance or other priority projects or programs, an official corporate partner may accept contributions, gifts, grants, and promotional campaign proceeds on behalf of the department or provide contributions, gifts, grants, and promotional campaign proceeds to the department. The department shall ensure that an official corporate partner transfers the contributions, gifts, grants, and promotional campaign proceeds accepted on behalf of the department to the department as soon as possible.

(b) The department may contract with one or more official corporate partners to conduct joint promotional campaigns or other fund-raising efforts conducted by the department to raise funds for state site operations and maintenance or other priority projects or programs.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 11.224. USE OF FUNDS. Money received by the department under this subchapter, including money received under a contract or licensing or other agreement or as a gift or grant, may be used only for state site operations and maintenance or other priority projects or programs.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 11.225. RULES. The commission shall adopt rules to implement this subchapter, including rules that establish guidelines or best practices for official corporate partners.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

Sec. 11.226. OTHER DONATION AUTHORITY NOT LIMITED. This subchapter does not limit the department's authority to accept donations that are otherwise authorized.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 152 (H.B. 1300), Sec. 1, eff. May 28, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER K. MANAGEMENT AND EFFICIENCY REVIEWS

Sec. 11.251. MAINTENANCE EQUIPMENT REVIEW SYSTEM. (a) In this section:

(1) "Maintenance equipment" means personal property owned by the department that is used to administer, operate, preserve, repair, expand, or otherwise maintain real property, including improvements and fixtures, owned or operated by the department.

(2) "Outdated equipment" means equipment:

(A) that has a fair market value that is less than the annual cost of maintaining the equipment in working order;

(B) that is not operational and cannot reasonably be made operational; or

(C) that no longer serves a department purpose.

(b) The commission by rule shall establish an equipment review system through which the department annually determines whether any of the department's maintenance equipment has become outdated equipment since the last date the department conducted an equipment review under this section.

(c) The equipment review system established under Subsection (b) must require the department to sell any outdated equipment in the manner and at the time specified by the commission by rule.

(d) The department shall deposit proceeds from the sale of equipment under this section to the credit of the appropriate parks and wildlife account.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 18, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 11.252. MAINTENANCE PROVIDER REVIEW SYSTEM. (a) In this section "maintenance" includes the administration, operation, preservation, repair, and expansion of personal property owned by the department and real property owned or operated by the department.

(b) The commission by rule shall establish a maintenance provider review system through which the department annually determines whether a maintenance task performed by the department could be performed by a third-party contractor in a manner that:

(1) is more cost-effective than the department's manner of performing the maintenance task; and

(2) yields a result that is equal to or greater than the quality of the result produced by the department performing the task.

(c) The maintenance provider review system established under Subsection (b) must require the department to contract with a third party for the performance of any maintenance task performed by the department that could be performed by a third-party contractor in the manner that meets the criteria described by Subsection (b) after the department's cost of administering the contract is added to the cost of performance by the third party.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 18, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 11.253. MANAGEMENT PLAN AND PRIORITIES LIST. Not later than January 15 of each odd-numbered year the department shall submit to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the lieutenant governor, and the chair of each house and senate standing committee having jurisdiction over a matter regulated by the department under this code a management plan to address the department's maintenance responsibilities under this subchapter and a priorities list that includes the following information:

(1) a prioritized list of facilities operated by the department that are most in need of repair, renovation, expansion, or other maintenance;

(2) an itemized list explaining any additional funding requested by the department to accomplish a task described by Subdivision (1); and

(3) the results of the reviews conducted under Sections 11.251, 11.252, and 13.019(b).

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1159 (H.B. 12), Sec. 18, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER L. USE OF DEPARTMENT LAND

Sec. 11.301. EASEMENTS. (a) The commission may grant, lease, or renew permanent or temporary right-of-way easements on department land for:

(1) public highways, roads and streets, and ditches;

(2) electric lines and pipelines, including necessary wires, pipes, poles, and other equipment used to transmit, convey, or distribute water, electricity, gas, oil, or similar substances or commodities;

(3) electrical substations;

(4) equipment stations, vaults, cabinets, poles, power pedestals, and underground lines, circuits, and conduits, and other equipment used in the provision of communication services; or

(5) the provision of utilities for the operation of facilities of the department and roadways for access to facilities of the department.

(b) Except as provided by this subsection, the commission may not grant or lease an easement unless the commission receives the fair market value as consideration for the grant or lease. Consideration for an easement may include goods and services. The commission may grant without consideration a state highway easement to the Texas Department of Transportation, a roadway easement to a county for connecting roads between state highways, easements to utility providers for utilities to serve department facilities, and roadway easements to a city or county to provide roadways for department facilities.

(c) A grant or lease must contain a full reservation of minerals in and under the land. The commission may impose other fair and reasonable conditions, covenants, and provisions.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 502 (H.B. 1449), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 11.302. CARBON SEQUESTRATION AND SIMILAR ECOSYSTEM SERVICES PROJECTS. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the department may enter into an agreement with a public or private entity for the purpose of developing a nature-based carbon sequestration or similar ecosystem services project on department land. This subsection does not authorize the department to enter into an agreement to develop a carbon dioxide injection well on department land.

(b) Money received by the department from a carbon sequestration or similar ecosystem services project under this section shall be deposited:

(1) to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account, if the project is located on land primarily used for game or fish conservation, protection, or management; and

(2) to the credit of the state parks account, if the project is located on land primarily used for parks, recreation, or historic sites.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 334 (H.B. 4018), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER M. PRESCRIBED BURNS

Sec. 11.351. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Landowner" includes any person who owns, has a property interest in, or leases a parcel of privately owned land or improvements on the land.

(2) "Utility infrastructure" means any facility owned by:

(A) an electric utility as "electric utility" is defined by Section 31.002, Utilities Code;

(B) a telecommunications utility as "telecommunications utility" is defined by Section 51.002, Utilities Code;

(C) a gas utility as "gas utility" is defined by Section 101.003 or 121.001, Utilities Code;

(D) an electric cooperative as "electric cooperative" is defined by Section 11.003, Utilities Code; or

(E) a municipally owned utility as "municipally owned utility" is defined by Section 11.003, Utilities Code.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.352. APPLICABILITY. This subchapter applies only to prescribed burns conducted by the department on state land managed by the department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.353. GENERAL AND SPECIFIC PLAN REQUIREMENTS. (a) The commission by rule shall adopt and shall require the department to implement a general plan for the use of beneficial prescribed burns in the management of department land. The general plan must include standards that meet or exceed the standards for a prescribed burn set out in Section 153.047, Natural Resources Code.

(b) The general plan must include variations as needed for different areas of the state.

(c) The general plan must be reviewed by the Prescribed Burning Board within the Department of Agriculture.

(d) The department may not conduct a prescribed burn under this subchapter before the general plan has been adopted by the commission.

(e) For a particular prescribed burn, a site-specific plan tailored to the designated area must be completed and approved by a person designated by the director to review prescribed burn plans. In addition to any site-specific information required under the general plan, a site-specific plan must include:

(1) the planned start and end dates of the prescribed burn;

(2) a map of the designated burn area, including the location of any utility infrastructure within the designated burn area;

(3) the names and contact numbers for:

(A) the prescribed burn manager;

(B) the nearest fire departments or emergency service providers; and

(C) all landowners whose property neighbors the designated burn area; and

(4) written documentation that applicable prescribed burn notification and approval requirements of the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality have been met.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.354. NOTICE REQUIREMENTS. (a) The department shall provide adequate advance notice of the department's intent to conduct a prescribed burn to each neighboring landowner and appropriate local officials in the vicinity of the designated burn area, including water utility officials with water facilities within two miles of the prescribed burn.

(b) The landowner's notice must include:

(1) the planned start and end dates of the prescribed burn;

(2) any safety precautions the landowner should take to ensure the safety of the landowner's property before, during, and after the burn;

(3) a map of the prescribed burn area, including the location of any utility infrastructure within the designated burn area;

(4) the methods proposed for use in conducting the burn; and

(5) contact information for the prescribed burn manager and the department.

(c) The department shall publish advance notice of a planned prescribed burn in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the burn will be conducted.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.355. INSURANCE. The department shall purchase liability insurance or establish a self-insurance fund as provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 2259, Government Code, for liability coverage for money damages in the amounts specified by Section 153.082, Natural Resources Code, to protect the department and the department's employees against claims under this subchapter resulting from:

(1) bodily injury or death resulting from a prescribed burn; or

(2) injury to or destruction of property resulting from a prescribed burn.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.356. LIABILITY. The department is liable for actual damages for:

(1) injury to or destruction of property, bodily injury, or death proximately caused by the wrongful act or omission or the negligence of an employee acting within the scope of employment if:

(A) the injury to or destruction of property, bodily injury, or death arises from the escape of fire from a prescribed burn conducted by the department; and

(B) the employee would be personally liable to the claimant according to Texas law;

(2) injury to or destruction of property, bodily injury, or death so caused by the escape of fire from a prescribed burn conducted by the department if the department would, were it a private person, be liable to the claimant according to Texas law; and

(3) injury to or destruction of utility infrastructure caused by a prescribed burn.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.357. LIMITATION ON AMOUNT OF LIABILITY. Liability of the department under this subchapter is limited to money damages in an amount not to exceed the amount paid by the insurance provider described by Section 11.355 to the claimant.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.358. APPLICATION OF TORT CLAIMS ACT. (a) A claim asserted under this subchapter may not also be asserted against the department under Subchapter B, Chapter 101, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, or against a department employee.

(b) Subchapter D, Chapter 101, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, applies to a suit brought under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

Sec. 11.359. WAIVER OF GOVERNMENTAL IMMUNITY; PERMISSION TO SUE. (a) Sovereign immunity to suit is waived and abolished to the extent of liability created by this subchapter.

(b) A person having a claim under this subchapter may sue the department for damages allowed by this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 345 (H.B. 801), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER N. INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY

Sec. 11.401. PROTECTION AND USE OF INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY. (a) The department may:

(1) apply for, register, secure, hold, and protect under the laws of the United States, any state, or any nation:

(A) a patent for an invention or discovery of, or improvement to, any process, machine, manufacture, or composition of matter;

(B) a copyright for an original work of authorship fixed in any tangible medium of expression now known or later developed that can be perceived, reproduced, or otherwise communicated;

(C) a trademark, service mark, collective mark, or certification mark for a word, name, symbol, device, or slogan, or any combination of those items, that has been adopted and used by the department to identify goods or services and distinguish those goods or services from other goods or services; or

(D) other evidence of protection or exclusivity issued in or for intellectual property;

(2) enter into a contract with an individual or company for the sale, lease, marketing, or other distribution of intellectual property of the department;

(3) obtain under a contract entered into under Subdivision (2) a royalty, license right, or other appropriate means of securing appropriate compensation for the development or purchase of intellectual property of the department; and

(4) waive or reduce the amount of a fee, royalty, or other thing of monetary or nonmonetary value to be assessed by the department if the department determines that the waiver will:

(A) further the goals and missions of the department; and

(B) result in a net benefit to the state.

(b) Intellectual property for which the department has applied for or received a patent, copyright, trademark, or other evidence of protection or exclusivity is excepted from required disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

(c) Money paid to the department under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the game, fish, and water safety account or the state parks account, as appropriate.

(d) It is not a violation of Chapter 572, Government Code, or another law of this state for an employee of the department who conceives, creates, discovers, invents, or develops intellectual property to own or to be awarded any amount of equity interest or participation in the research, development, licensing, or exploitation of that intellectual property with the approval of the commission.

(e) The commission shall institute intellectual property policies for the department that establish minimum standards for:

(1) the public disclosure or availability of products, technology, and scientific information, including inventions, discoveries, trade secrets, and computer software;

(2) review by the department of products, technology, and scientific information, including consideration of ownership and appropriate legal protection;

(3) the licensing of products, technology, and scientific information;

(4) the identification of ownership and licensing responsibilities for each class of intellectual property; and

(5) royalty participation by inventors and the department.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1181 (S.B. 1132), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Redesignated from Parks and Wildlife Code, Section 11.351 by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 24.001(34), eff. September 1, 2017.